Washington statutes.
RCW 19.31.140

Fees for licensees.

The director shall determine the fees, as provided in RCW 43.24.086, charged to those parties licensed as employment agencies for original applications, renewal per year, branch license, both original and renewal, transfer of license, and approval of amended or new contracts and/or fee schedules.

[ 1985 c 7 s 84; 1975 1st ex.s. c 30 s 92; 1969 ex.s. c 228 s 14.]